pt-BR: Veículo recreativo reservatório de retenção tipo: Água negra + cinza; Somente água negra; Vaso sanitário cassete; Vaso sanitário compostável (sem tanque de água negra); Somente água cinza; Sem tanques de retenção; Outro
fr: Indique les réservoirs d’eaux usées dont le camping-car est équipé.: Eaux noires et grises; Eaux noires uniquement; Toilettes à cassette; Toilettes à compost (sans réservoir d'eaux noires); Eaux grises uniquement; Aucun réservoir de rétention; Autre
zh-TW: 露營車廢水箱類型: 黑水 + 灰水; 僅黑水; 卡匣式馬桶; 堆肥馬桶 (無黑水箱); 僅灰水; 無污水箱; 其他
sv: Typ av avfallstank för fritidsfordon: Svart- och gråvatten; Endast svartvatten; Kassetttoalett; Komposttoalett (ingen svartvattentank); Endast gråvatten; Inga tankar; Övrigt
lt-LT: Poilsinės transporto priemonės rezervuaro tipas: Juodojo + pilkojo vandens; Tik juodojo vandens; Kasetinis tualetas; Kompostavimo tualetas (be juodojo vandens bako); Tik pilkojo vandens; Be bakų; Kita
cs: Typ sběrné nádrže pro rekreační vozidla: Černá a šedá voda; Pouze černá voda; Kazetové WC; Kompostovací WC (bez černé nádrže); Pouze šedá voda; Žádné záchytné nádrže; Ostatní
en: Recreational vehicle holding tank type: Black + gray; Black water only; Cassette toilet; Composting toilet (no black tank); Gray water only; No holding tanks; Other
it: Serbatoio di raccolta per veicoli ricreazionali: Acque nere + grigie; Solo acque nere; Toilette a cassetta; Toilette a secco (nessun serbatoio acque nere); Solo acque grigie; Nessun serbatoio di recupero; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de reservatório de resíduos do veículo recreativo: Água negra + cinzenta; Apenas águas negras; Sanita de cassete; Sanita de compostagem (sem depósito de águas negras); Apenas águas cinzentas; Sem depósitos de retenção; Outro
nb: Type septiktank for fritidskjøretøy: Svart og grå; Kun svartvann; Kassett-toalett; Komposteringstoalett (ingen svartvannstank); Kun gråvann; Ingen avløpstanker; Annet
ko: 레크리에이션 차량용 오수 탱크 유형: 블랙 + 그레이; 블랙 워터 전용; 카세트 변기; 퇴비화 변기(블랙 탱크 없음); 그레이 워터 전용; 보관 탱크 없음; 기타
ja: RV用貯水/汚水タンクタイプ: ブラック + グレー; ブラックウォーターのみ; カセットトイレ; コンポストトイレ (ブラックタンクなし); グレーウォーターのみ; ホールディングタンクなし; その他
el: Τύπος ρεζερβουάρ αποθήκευσης για τροχόσπιτο: Μαύρο + γκρι; Μόνο για λύματα; Τουαλέτα-κασέτα; Τουαλέτα κομποστοποίησης (χωρίς δεξαμενή λυμάτων); Μόνο για γκρίζα νερά; Χωρίς δεξαμενές κράτησης; Άλλο
pl: Typ zbiornika kampera: Czarna i szara woda; Tylko czarna woda; Toaleta kasetowa; Toaleta kompostująca (bez zbiornika na czarną wodę); Tylko szara woda; Brak zbiorników na nieczystości; Inne
sk-SK: Typ zbernej nádrže pre rekreačné vozidlá: Čierna + sivá; Iba čierna voda; Kazetové WC; Kompostovacie WC (bez nádrže na čiernu vodu); Iba sivá voda; Bez zberných nádrží; Iné
bg-BG: Тип резервоар за отпадни води на кемпер: Черни + сиви води; Само черни води; Касетъчна тоалетна; Компостираща тоалетна (без резервоар за черни води); Само сиви води; Без резервоари за съхранение; Други
de: Abwassertanktyp für Wohnmobile: Schwarz- + Grauwasser; Nur Schwarzwasser; Kassettentoilette; Komposttoilette (ohne Schwarzwassertank); Nur Grauwasser; Keine Fäkalientanks; Sonstige
th: ประเภทถังเก็บของเสียสำหรับรถบ้าน: น้ำเสีย + น้ำทิ้ง; น้ำเสียเท่านั้น; สุขภัณฑ์แบบตลับ; ห้องน้ำหมักปุ๋ย (ไม่มีถังน้ำเสีย); น้ำทิ้งเท่านั้น; ไม่มีถังเก็บน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип накопительного бака автодома: Черная + серая вода; Только черная вода; Кассетный туалет; Компостирующий туалет (без бака для черной воды); Только серая вода; Нет накопительных баков; Другое
zh-CN: 房车废水箱类型: 黑水 + 灰水; 仅黑水; 盒式马桶; 堆肥式马桶（无黑水箱）; 仅灰水; 无黑灰水箱; 其他
es: Tipo de depósito de retención para vehículos recreativos: Negras + grises; Solo aguas negras; Inodoro de casete; Inodoro de compostaje (sin tanque de aguas negras); Solo aguas grises; Sin tanques de almacenamiento; Otro
fi: Matkailuajoneuvon säiliön tyyppi: Mustavesi + harmaavesi; Vain mustavesi; Kasettikäymälä; Kompostikäymälä (ei mustavesisäiliötä); Vain harmaavesi; Ei septisäiliöitä; Muu
vi: Loại bể chứa cho xe giải trí: Nước đen + nước xám; Chỉ nước đen; Bồn cầu cassette; Bồn cầu ủ phân sinh học (không có bình chứa nước đen); Chỉ nước xám; Không có bình chứa; Khác
hu: Lakójármű hulladéktartályának típusa: Fekete- és szürkevíz; Csak feketevíz; Kazettás WC; Komposztáló WC (nincs feketevíz-tartály); Csak szürkevíz; Nincsenek tartályok; Egyéb
hr-HR: Tip spremnika za rekreacijsko vozilo: Crna i siva voda; Samo crna voda; Kazetni zahod; Kompostni zahod (bez spremnika za crnu vodu); Samo siva voda; Bez spremnika za otpadnu vodu; Ostalo
tr: Karavan tipi atık su deposu: Siyah + gri; Yalnızca siyah su; Kasetli tuvalet; Kompost tuvalet (siyah tank yok); Yalnızca gri su; Atık tankı yok; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip rezervor pentru vehicule recreaționale: Apă neagră + gri; Doar apă neagră; Toaletă cu casetă; Toaletă cu compostare (fără rezervor pentru apă neagră); Doar apă gri; Fără rezervoare de colectare; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta zbiralnega rezervoarja za počitniška vozila (avtodome/prikolice): Črna in siva voda; Samo črna voda; Kasetno stranišče; Kompostno stranišče (brez rezervoarja za črno vodo); Samo siva voda; Brez rezervoarjev; Drugo
nl: Camper vuilwatertank type: Zwart + grijs; Alleen zwart water; Cassettetoilet; Composttoilet (geen zwartwatertank); Alleen grijs water; Geen vuilwatertanks; Overig
da: Autocampers type opsamlingstanke: Sort + grå; Kun sort spildevand; Kassettetoilet; Komposttoilet (ingen sortvandstank); Kun gråt spildevand; Ingen spildevandstanke; Andet